Illinois, session 104th, HB3338.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Revenue Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 62505-820 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2505/2505-820 new)8    Sec. 2505-820. Property tax replacement feasibility study. 9Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department, in 10consultation with the Governor's Office of Management and 11Budget, shall conduct a study to determine the feasibility of 12eliminating, by no later than January 1, 2030, the property 13tax system in the State and replacing that revenue with income 14tax receipts. The study shall (i) examine other states that do 15not allow for the imposition of taxes against real property 16and (ii) propose spending cuts or an increased income tax rate 17to facilitate the change.